District of Columbia statutes.
33-209.10

Repealed

Compliance with subchapter is not consent to suit.

Repealed.

Dec. 10, 1987, D.C. Law 7-49, § 910, 34 DCR 6856
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(y), 58 DCR 1720
1981 Ed., § 41-499.1.